Hawaii statutes.
§386-43 Duration of dependents' weekly
benefits. (a) The weekly benefits to dependents shall continue:

(1) To a surviving spouse or reciprocal beneficiary,
until death, remarriage, marriage, or entry into a new reciprocal beneficiary
relationship with two years' compensation in one sum upon remarriage, marriage,
or entry into a new reciprocal beneficiary relationship;

(2) To or for a child:

(A) So long as unmarried, until attainment of
the age of eighteen;

(B) So long as unmarried, until attainment of
the age of:

(i) Twenty if the child is a full-time student
at a high school, business school, technical school; or

(ii) Twenty-two if the child is a full-time
undergraduate student at a college;

(C) So long as unmarried, until termination
of the child's incapability of self-support; or

(D) Until marriage, except that in the case
of a married child under eighteen, weekly benefits shall continue during the
period of actual dependency until attainment of the age of eighteen;

(3) To a parent or grandparent, for the duration,
whether continuous or not, of the actual dependency, provided that the amount
of the weekly benefits shall at no time exceed the amount payable at the time
of death; and

(4) To or for a grandchild, brother, or sister, for the
period in which that grandchild, brother, or sister remains actually and wholly
dependent until attainment of the age of eighteen or termination of the
incapability of self-support.

(b) The aggregate weekly benefits payable on
account of any one death shall not exceed the product of three hundred twelve
times the effective maximum weekly benefit rate prescribed in section 386-31,
but this limitation shall not apply with respect to benefits to a surviving
spouse or reciprocal beneficiary who is physically or mentally incapable of
self-support and unmarried as long as that surviving spouse or reciprocal
beneficiary remains in that condition and to benefits to a child and to
benefits to an unmarried child over eighteen incapable of self-support as long
as that unmarried child is otherwise entitled to compensation.

(c) Upon the cessation under this section of
compensation to or for any person, the benefits of the remaining dependents in
the same class for any further period during which they are entitled to weekly
payments shall be in the amounts which they would have received, had they been
the only dependents entitled to benefits at the time of the employee's death.
[L 1963, c 116, pt of §1; Supp, §97-42; am L 1966, c 6, §2; am L 1967, c 257,
§2; HRS §386-43; am L 1974, c 151, §2 and c 153, §5; am L 1975, c 4, §1; gen ch
1985; am L 1997, c 383, §55; am L 2016, c 55, §14]

Case Notes

The date-of-death maximum weekly benefit rate should be used
to calculate death benefits. 109 H. 255, 125 P.3d 476 (2005).

Part-time students, as defined by each individual educational
institution, are not entitled to compensation under subsection (a) and
§386-42(a). 84 H. 390 (App.), 935 P.2d 105 (1997).

Cited: 27 H. 431, 435 (1923).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next